Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-128
Irrigation; declared a public use.

The use of all water required for the irrigation of lands of any district formed under the provisions of sections 46-101 to 46-128, together with canals and ditches already constructed, the rights-of-way for canals and ditches, sites for reservoirs and pumping plants, and all other property required in fully carrying out the provisions of sections 46-101 to 46-1,111, is hereby declared to be a public use, subject to the regulation and control of the state in the manner prescribed by law.

Laws 1895, c. 70, § 10, p. 277;

Laws 1903, c. 121, § 1, p. 619;

Laws 1905, c. 166, § 1, p. 651;

Laws 1909, c. 157, § 1, p. 568;

Laws 1911, c. 159, § 1, p. 528;

Laws 1913, c. 226, § 1, p. 657;

R.S.1913, § 3466;

Laws 1915, c. 69, § 3, p. 175;

C.S.1922, § 2866;

C.S.1929, § 46-110;

R.S.1943, § 46-128.

This section does no more than provide that land necessarily taken to benefit an irrigation district is taken for a public use, and whether the use for which property is taken is public or private in nature is a judicial question, not a legislative one. Chimney Rock Irr. Dist. v. Fawcus Springs Irr. Dist., 218 Neb. 777, 359 N.W.2d 100 (1984).